Utah statutes.
10-17-102.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Animal" means a cat or dog.
(2)  "Animal shelter" means a facility or program:
(a)  providing services for stray, lost, or unwanted animals, including
holding and placing the animals for adoption, but does not include an
institution conducting research on animals, as defined in Section 26-26-1; and
(b)  operated by:
(i)  a first or second class county as defined in Section 17-50-501;
(ii)  a city of the first, second, or third class;
(iii)  a first or second class county operating the shelter jointly with any
municipality; or
(iv)  a private humane society or private animal welfare organization located
within a first or second class county or within a city of the first, second,
or third class.
(3)  "Person" means an individual, an entity, or a representative of an
entity.
(4)  "Proof of sterilization" means a written document signed by a
veterinarian licensed under Title 58, Chapter 28, Veterinary Practice Act,
stating:
(a)  a specified animal has been sterilized;
(b)  the date on which the sterilization was performed; and
(c)  the location where the sterilization was performed.
(5)  "Recipient" means the person to whom an animal shelter transfers an
animal for adoption.
(6)  "Sterilization deposit" means the portion of a fee charged by an animal
shelter to a recipient or claimant of an unsterilized animal to ensure the
animal is timely sterilized in accordance with an agreement between the
recipient or the claimant and the animal shelter.
(7)  "Sterilized" means that an animal has been surgically altered, either by
the spaying of a female animal or by the neutering of a male animal, so it is
unable to reproduce.
(8)  "Transfer" means that an animal shelter sells, gives away, places for
adoption, or transfers an animal to a recipient.
